Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2416.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 232.68, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: a. (1) âInterviewâ means either of the following: (a) A verbal exchange between the child protection worker and the child for the purpose of developing information necessary to protect the child. (b) A verbal exchange between a forensic interviewer at a child protection center or a child advocacy center and the child for the purpose of developing information necessary to protect the child. (2) A child protection worker or a forensic interviewer at a child protection center or a child advocacy center is not precluded from recording visible evidence of abuse. Sec. 2. Section 232.71B, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: b. If a report is determined not to constitute a child abuse allegation or if the child abuse report is accepted but assessed under the family assessment, but a criminal act harming a child is alleged, the department shall immediately refer the matter to the appropriate law enforcement agency. If a child abuse allegation is referred to law enforcement and the childâs parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian does not Senate File 2416, p. 2 give permission to enter the childâs home, to interview the child, or to observe the child, the court or district court upon a showing of probable cause may authorize entry into the childâs home, an interview with the child, or observation of the child. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2416, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor